Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-417 Subscriber's liability on
judgments. (a) No action shall lie against any subscriber upon any
obligation claimed against the insurer until a final judgment has been obtained
against the insurer and remains unsatisfied for thirty days.

(b) Any such judgment, or any judgment against
the insurer based upon legal process served in compliance with section
431:2-206, shall be binding upon each of the insurer's subscribers only in such
proportion as the subscriber's interests may appear and in an amount not
exceeding the subscriber's contingent liabilities. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next